Maryland, session 2026, HB0549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 5–607(l) and (m) of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 5–607(m) and (n), respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(u) “Registered domestic partner” means an individual in a registered domestic
partnership.
(v) “Registered domestic partnership” means a domestic partnership that is
registered in accordance with § 2–214 of this article.
Article – Financial Institutions
12–802.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Currency” means currency and coin of the United States or any other country.

HOUSE BILL 549 3
12–1201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) (1) “Virtual currency” means a digital representation of value that:
(i) Is used as a medium of exchange, unit of account, or store of
value; and
(ii) Is not currency, as defined in § 12–802 of this title.
(2) “Virtual currency” does not include:
(i) A digital representation of value that can be redeemed for:
1. Goods, services, discounts, or purchases solely as part of a
customer affinity or rewards program with the issuing merchant or other designated
merchants, or both; or
2. Digital units in another customer affinity or rewards
program that may not directly or indirectly be converted into, redeemed, or exchanged for
money, monetary value, bank credit, or virtual currency; or
(ii) A digital representation of value issued by or on behalf of a
publisher that:
1. Is used solely within an online game, game platform, or
family of games sold by the same publisher or offered on the same game platform;
2. Has no market or application outside of the online game,
game platform, or family of games;
3. May not directly or indirectly be converted into, redeemed,
or exchanged for money, monetary value, bank credit, or virtual currency; and
4. May or may not be redeemable for real–world goods,
services, discounts, or purchases.
Article – General Provisions
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated unless:
(1) the context clearly requires a different meaning; or

HOUSE BILL 549
(2) a different definition is adopted for a particular provision.
(F–1) “DOMESTIC PARTNER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL IN A DOMESTIC
PARTNERSHIP.
(F–2) “DOMESTIC PARTNERSHIP” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 6–101(A) OF
THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(n) “Financial interest” means:
(1) ownership of an interest as the result of which the owner has received
within the past 3 years, is currently receiving, or in the future is entitled to receive, more
than $1,000 per year; or
(2) (i) ownership of more than 3% of a business entity by:
1. an official;
2. an employee; or
3. the spouse, DOMESTIC PARTNER, OR REGISTERED
DOMESTIC PARTNER of an official or employee; or
(ii) ownership of securities of any kind that represent, or are
convertible into, ownership of more than 3% of a business entity by:
1. an official;
2. an employee; or
3. the spouse, DOMESTIC PARTNER, OR REGISTERED
DOMESTIC PARTNER of an official or employee.
(s) “Immediate family” means an individual’s spouse, DOMESTIC PARTNER, OR
REGISTERED DOMESTIC PARTNER and dependent children.
(z) “Member of household” means:
(1) if sharing an individual’s legal residence, the individual’s:
(i) spouse;
(ii) DOMESTIC PARTNER OR REGISTERED DOMESTIC PARTNER;
(III) child;

HOUSE BILL 549 5
[(iii)] (IV) ward;
[(iv)] (V) financially dependent parent; or
[(v)] (VI) other financially dependent relative; or
(2) an individual’s spouse, DOMESTIC PARTNER, REGISTERED
DOMESTIC PARTNER, child, ward, parent, or other relative, over whose financial affairs
the individual has legal or actual control.
(gg) “Qualifying relative” means a spouse, DOMESTIC PARTNER, REGISTERED
DOMESTIC PARTNER, parent, child, brother, or sister.
(GG–2) “REGISTERED DOMESTIC PARTNER” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 1–101 OF THE ESTATES AND TRUSTS ARTICLE.
(GG–3) “REGISTERED DOMESTIC PARTNERSHIP” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 1–101 OF THE ESTATES AND TRUSTS ARTICLE.
(NN) “VIRTUAL CURRENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–1201 OF THE
FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE.
5–501.1
(a) In this section, “restricted individual” means:
(1) a spouse, DOMESTIC PARTNER, OR REGISTERED DOMESTIC
PARTNER of the Governor;
(2) a parent or stepparent of the Governor;
(3) a sibling or stepsibling of the Governor;
(4) a child, stepchild, foster child, or ward of the Governor;
(5) a mother–in–law or father–in–law of the Governor;
(6) a son–in–law or daughter–in–law of the Governor;
(7) a grandparent of the Governor or the Governor’s spouse;
(8) a grandchild of the Governor; or
(9) except for an employee of the Governor, any individual who resides in
the Governor’s primary residence.

HOUSE BILL 549
5–514.
(b) (1) A legislator shall report the following information in writing to the
Joint Ethics Committee at the times and in the manner required by the Joint Ethics
Committee:
(i) subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, if representing a
person for compensation before a State or local government agency, except in a judicial
proceeding or in a quasi–judicial proceeding, the name of the person represented, the
services performed, and the consideration;
(ii) if representing a State or local government agency for
compensation, the name of the agency, the services performed, and the consideration;
(iii) the name of any business enterprise subject to regulation by a
State agency in which the legislator and a member of the legislator’s immediate family
(spouse, DOMESTIC PARTNER, OR REGISTERED DOMESTIC PARTNER, and children
living with the legislator), together or separately, have:
1. the lesser of:
A. 10% or more of the capital stock of any corporation; or
B. capital stock of any corporation with a cumulative value of
$35,000 or more; and
2. any interest in a partnership, limited liability partnership,
or limited liability company;
(iv) except for employment as a legislator, details, including the
subject matter and consideration, of any financial or contractual relationship, including a
financial or contractual relationship involving a business entity whose interests are
attributable to the legislator under § 5–608 of this title, with:
1. the University of Maryland Medical System;
2. a governmental entity of the State or a local government
in the State; or
3. a quasi–governmental entity of the State or a local
government in the State;
(v) details of any transaction with a governmental entity of the State
or a local government in the State involving a monetary consideration;
(vi) except for employment as a legislator, the name of any:

HOUSE BILL 549 7
1. primary employer of the legislator;
2. primary employer of the legislator’s spouse, DOMESTIC
PARTNER, OR REGISTERED DOMESTIC PARTNER; and
3. business from which the legislator or the legislator’s
spouse, DOMESTIC PARTNER, OR REGISTERED DOMESTIC PARTNER receives earned
income as a result of an ownership interest in the business;
(vii) except in a judicial or quasi–judicial proceeding, the name of any
client of the legislator or of a business entity in which the legislator has an ownership
interest if the legislator:
1. is assisting the client in seeking a State or local
government contract, license, or other competitive award; and
2. will receive or expects to receive a direct financial benefit
as a result of the award of the contract, license, or other competitive award to the client;
and
(viii) if the legislator’s spouse, DOMESTIC PARTNER, OR
REGISTERED DOMESTIC PARTNER is an individual regulated lobbyist, the name of each
entity that has engaged the lobbyist for lobbying purposes.
5–601.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, and subject to
subsections (d) and (e) of this section, each official and candidate for office as a State official
shall file a FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE statement as specified in §§ 5–602 through 5–608 of
this subtitle.
5–607.
(a) A FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE statement that is required under § 5–601(a) of
this subtitle shall contain schedules disclosing the information and interests specified in
this section, if known, for the individual making the statement for the applicable period.
(i) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the statement
shall include a schedule listing the name and address of each:
(i) source of the compensated employment, including secondary
employment, of the individual or a member of the individual’s immediate family at any
time during the applicable period;

HOUSE BILL 549
(ii) business entity of which the individual or a member of the
individual’s immediate family was a sole or partial owner, and from which the individual
or family member received earned income, at any time during the applicable period; and
(iii) for a statement filed on or after January 1, 2019, if the
individual’s spouse, DOMESTIC PARTNER, OR REGISTERED DOMESTIC PARTNER is a
regulated lobbyist, entity that has engaged the spouse, DOMESTIC PARTNER, OR
REGISTERED DOMESTIC PARTNER for lobbying purposes.
(2) The statement may not include a listing of a minor child’s employment
or business entities of which the child is sole or partial owner, unless the place of
employment or the business entity:
(i) is subject to the regulation or authority of the agency that
employs the individual; or
(ii) has contracts in excess of $10,000 with the agency that employs
the individual.
(L) (1) THE FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE STATEMENT SHALL INCLUDE A
SCHEDULE OF EACH INTEREST IN A VIRTUAL CURRENCY HELD BY THE INDIVIDUAL
VALUED IN EXCESS OF $1,000.
(2) FOR EACH INTEREST REPORTED, THE SCHEDULE SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) THE TYPE AND NAME OF THE VIRTUAL CURRENCY;
(II) THE NATURE AND AMOUNT OF INTEREST HELD, INCLUDING
ANY CONDITIONS TO AND ENCUMBRANCES ON THE INTEREST;
(III) IF ANY INTEREST WAS ACQUIRED DURING THE APPLICABLE
PERIOD:
1. THE DATE AND MANNER IN WHICH THE INTEREST WAS
ACQUIRED;
2. THE IDENTITY OF THE ENTITY FROM WHICH THE
INTEREST WAS ACQUIRED;
3. IF THE INTEREST WAS ACQUIRED BY PURCHASE, THE
NATURE AND AMOUNT OF THE CONSIDERATION GIVEN FOR THE INTEREST; AND

HOUSE BILL 549 9
4. IF THE INTEREST WAS ACQUIRED BY ANY MANNER
OTHER THAN BY PURCHASE, THE FAIR MARKET VALUE OF THE INTEREST WHEN IT
WAS ACQUIRED; AND
(IV) IF ANY INTEREST WAS TRANSFERRED, IN WHOLE OR IN
PART, DURING THE APPLICABLE PERIOD:
1. A DESCRIPTION OF THE INTEREST TRANSFERRED;
2. THE NATURE AND AMOUNT OF THE CONSIDERATION
RECEIVED FOR THE INTEREST; AND
3. IF KNOWN, THE IDENTITY OF THE ENTITY TO WHICH
THE INTEREST WAS TRANSFERRED.
5–608.
(a) The following are deemed to be interests of the individual under § 5–607(b),
(c), (d), (j), [and] (k), AND (L) of this subtitle:
(1) an interest held by a spouse, DOMESTIC PARTNER, REGISTERED
DOMESTIC PARTNER, or child of the individual, if the interest was controlled, directly or
indirectly, by the individual at any time during the applicable period;
(2) an interest held, at any time during the applicable period, by:
(i) a business entity in which the individual held a 10% or greater
interest;
(ii) a business entity described in item (i) of this item in which the
business entity held a 25% or greater interest;
(iii) a business entity described in item (ii) of this item in which the
business entity held a 50% or greater interest; and
(iv) a business entity in which the individual directly or indirectly,
through an interest in one or a combination of other business entities, holds a 10% or
greater interest; and
(3) an interest held by a trust or an estate in which, at any time during the
applicable period, the individual:
(i) held a reversionary interest;
(ii) was a beneficiary; or

HOUSE BILL 549
(iii) if a revocable trust, was a settlor.
(b) Subsection (a)(2) of this section does not affect:
(1) the requirement under § 5–607(b) of this subtitle of disclosure of real
estate interests held in the name of a partnership, limited liability partnership, or limited
liability company in which the individual holds an interest; or
(2) the requirement under § 5–607(c) of this subtitle of disclosure of all
partnerships, limited liability partnerships, or limited liability companies in which the
individual holds an interest.
(c) For the purposes of § 5–607 of this subtitle, interests held by a blind trust may
not be considered to be interests of the person making the FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE
statement if the blind trust is approved by the Ethics Commission in accordance with
regulations adopted under § 5–501(b) or § 5–502(c) of this title and is operated in
compliance with those regulations.
5–707.
(c) An individual regulated lobbyist is subject to the reporting requirements of
this subtitle if the individual regulated lobbyist engages in a business transaction with:
(1) a member of the General Assembly;
(2) the Governor;
(3) the Lieutenant Governor;
(4) the Attorney General;
(5) the Secretary of State;
(6) the Comptroller;
(7) the State Treasurer;
(8) the secretary of any principal State department;
(9) the spouse, DOMESTIC PARTNER, OR REGISTERED DOMESTIC
PARTNER of an individual listed in items (1) through (8) of this subsection;
(10) a business entity in which an individual listed in items (1) through (9)
of this subsection participates as a proprietor or partner; or
(11) a business entity in which an individual listed in items (1) through (9)
of this subsection has an ownership interest of at least 30%.

HOUSE BILL 549 11
Article – Health – General
6–101.
(a) In this title, “domestic partnership” means a relationship between two
individuals who:
(1) Are at least 18 years old;
(2) Are not related to each other by blood or marriage within four degrees
of consanguinity under civil law rule;
(3) Are not married or in a civil union or domestic partnership with another
individual; and
(4) Agree to be in a relationship of mutual interdependence in which each
individual contributes to the maintenance and support of the other individual and the
relationship, even if both individuals are not required to contribute equally to the
relationship.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.